Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 5 Convening of Courts-Martial

38-2-1022.
Convening of general courts-martial.

General courts-martial may be convened by the Governor. The Governor may delegate the authority to convene general courts-martial to the adjutant general, but such authority shall not be delegated further.

If the Governor is the accuser, the general court-martial shall be convened by the Lieutenant Governor.

For administrative purposes other than the actual convening of a general court-martial, the adjutant general shall be considered the general court-martial convening authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1022

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 822

.

38-2-1023.
Convening of special courts-martial.

Special courts-martial may be convened by the Governor, the adjutant general, the assistant adjutant general for army, or the assistant adjutant general for air.

If any individual in subsection (a) of this Code section is an accuser, the special court-martial shall be convened by superior competent authority and may in any case be convened by such superior authority if considered desirable by such authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1023

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 823

.

38-2-1024.
Convening of summary courts-martial.

Summary courts-martial may be convened by:

Any person authorized to convene a special court-martial under subsection (a) of Code Section 38-2-1023; or

Any commander in the grade of O-6 or above.

If any individual listed in subsection (a) of this Code section is an accuser, the summary court-martial shall be convened by superior competent authority and may in any case be convened by such superior authority if considered desirable by such authority.

The Governor, or the adjutant general by delegation of the Governor, may, by written order, further limit who may convene actions under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1024

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 824

.

38-2-1025.
Eligibility to serve on courts-martial.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “unit” means any regularly organized body of the organized militia not larger than a company, a squadron, a division of the naval militia, or a body corresponding to one of them.

Any commissioned officer of the organized militia shall be eligible to serve on all courts-martial for the trial of any person who is subject to this article.

Any warrant officer of the organized militia shall be eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any person who is subject to this article, other than a commissioned officer.

Any enlisted member of the organized militia who is not a member of the same unit as the accused shall be eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any enlisted member who is subject to this article, but such enlisted member shall serve as a member of a court only if, before the conclusion of a session called by the military judge under Code Section 38-2-1039 prior to trial or, in the absence of such a session, before the court is assembled for the trial of the accused, the accused personally has requested orally on the record or in writing that enlisted members serve on it. After such a request, the accused shall not be tried by a general or special court-martial the membership of which does not include enlisted members in a number comprising at least one-third of the total membership of the court, unless eligible enlisted members cannot be obtained on account of physical conditions or military exigencies. If such members cannot be obtained, the court shall be assembled and the trial held without such enlisted members, but the convening authority shall make a detailed written statement, to be appended to the record, stating why such number of enlisted members could not be obtained.

No person who is subject to this article shall be tried by a court-martial any member of which is junior to the accused in rank or grade.

When convening a court-martial, the convening authority shall detail as members thereof such members of the organized militia as, in the convening authority’s opinion, are best qualified for the duty by reason of age, education, training, experience, length of service, and judicial temperament. No member of the organized militia shall be eligible to serve as a member of a general or special court-martial when that member is the accuser, a witness, or has acted as investigating officer or as counsel in the same case.

Before a court-martial is assembled for the trial of a case, the convening authority may excuse a member of the court from participating in the case. The convening authority may delegate the authority under this subsection to a judge advocate or to any other principal assistant.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1025

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 825

.

38-2-1026.
Military judge.

A military judge shall be detailed to each general and special court-martial by the authority convening a general or special court-martial. The military judge shall preside over each open session of the court-martial to which the military judge has been detailed.

A military judge shall be:

An active or retired commissioned officer of the organized militia or state military force of another state or of the armed forces of the United States or a reserve component thereof;

A member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of another state or a member of the bar of a federal court for at least five years; and

Certified as qualified for duty as a military judge by the judge advocate general of the army, air force, or navy and the state judge advocate.

In the instance when a military judge is not a member of the bar of the highest court of this state, the military judge shall be deemed admitted pro hac vice, subject to filing a certificate with the state judge advocate setting forth such qualifications as provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section.

The military judge of a general or special court-martial shall be designated by the state judge advocate, or a designee, for detail by the convening authority. Neither the convening authority nor any primary staff member of the convening authority shall prepare or review any report concerning the effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency of the military judge so detailed, which relates to performance of duty as a military judge.

Whenever possible, the military judge of a general or special court-martial shall be of the same branch of service as the accused.

No person shall be eligible to act as military judge in a case if that person is the accuser or a witness or has acted as investigating officer or a counsel in the same case.

The military judge of a court-martial shall not consult with the members of the court except in the presence of the accused, trial counsel, and defense counsel and shall not vote with the members of the court.

If no person who meets the qualifications to serve as military judge under this Code section is readily available in the sole discretion of the state judge advocate, a law officer shall be appointed. A law officer may serve in place of a military judge provided he or she meets the qualifications as provided for in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section and is approved for such service, in writing, by the state judge advocate.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1026

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, a period was added at the end of paragraph (b)(3).

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 826

.

38-2-1027.
Trial counsel and assistants.

For each general and special court-martial the convening authority shall detail a trial counsel and such assistants as appropriate.

For each general and special court-martial, if the United States Army Trial Defense Services or a similar entity exists, such entity shall detail defense counsel and such assistants as are appropriate. If no appropriate such entity exists, the convening authority shall detail defense counsel and such assistants as are appropriate.

No person who has acted as investigating officer, military judge, a witness, or court member in any case may act later as trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, or, unless expressly requested by the accused, as defense counsel or assistant or associate defense counsel in the same case. No person who has acted for the prosecution may act later in the same case for the defense nor may any person who has acted for the defense act later in the same case for the prosecution.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, trial counsel or defense counsel detailed for a general or special court-martial shall be a judge advocate.

In the instance where a defense counsel is not a member of the bar of the highest court of this state, the defense counsel shall be deemed admitted pro hac vice, subject to filing a certificate with the military judge setting forth the qualifications that counsel is:

A commissioned officer of the organized militia or state military force of another state or of the armed forces of the United States or a reserve component thereof;

A member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of another state; and

Certified as a judge advocate in the judge advocate general’s corps of the army, air force, navy, or the marine corps.

Nothing in this Code section shall preclude the accused from hiring a civilian attorney who is a member of the bar of this state or who has been admitted pro hac vice. Such attorney shall serve the accused at no cost to another state or the federal government.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1027

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Right of counsel, U.S. Const., amend. 6 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XIV.

Attorneys generally, T. 15, C. 19.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 827

.

38-2-1028.
Appointment of court reporters and interpreters.

Under such regulations as may be prescribed by the Governor pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter, the convening authority of a general or special court-martial or court of inquiry shall detail or employ qualified court reporters who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court. Under like regulations, the convening authority may detail or employ interpreters who shall interpret for the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1028

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 828

.

38-2-1029.
Absent and additional members; not less than six members required; disability of judge.

No member of a general or special court-martial shall be absent or excused after the court has been assembled for the trial of the accused unless excused as a result of a challenge, excused by the military judge for physical disability or other good cause, or excused by order of the convening authority for good cause.

Whenever a general court-martial, other than a general court-martial composed of a military judge only, is reduced below six members, the trial shall not proceed unless the convening authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than six members. The trial shall proceed with the new members present after the recorded evidence previously introduced before the members of the court has been read to the court in the presence of the military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

Whenever a special court-martial, other than a special court-martial composed of a military judge only, is reduced below six members, the trial shall not proceed unless the convening authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than six members. The trial shall proceed with the new members present as if no evidence had been introduced previously at the trial, unless a verbatim record of the evidence previously introduced before the members of the court or a stipulation thereof is read to the court in the presence of the military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

If the military judge of a court-martial composed of a military judge only is unable to proceed with the trial because of physical disability, as a result of a challenge, or for other good cause, the trial shall proceed, subject to any applicable conditions of subparagraph (B) of paragraphs (1) and (2) of Code Section 38-2-1016, after the detail of a new military judge as if no evidence had previously been introduced, unless a verbatim record of the evidence previously introduced or a stipulation thereof is read in court in the presence of the new military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1029

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 829

.